Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Perjury and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d, Perjury, § 1 et seq.

70 C.J.S., Perjury, § 1 et seq.

Procuring perjury as contempt,
29 ALR2d 1157.

Imputation of perjury or false swearing as actionable per se, 38 ALR2d 161.

Statement of belief or opinion as perjury, 66 ALR2d 791.

Perjury or false swearing as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Dismissal of action because of party’s perjury or suppression of evidence, 11 ALR3d 1153.

Actionability of conspiracy to give or to procure false testimony or other evidence,
31 ALR3d 1423.

Offense of perjury as affected by lack of jurisdiction by court or government body before which false testimony was given, 36 ALR3d 1038.

Perjury or wilfully false testimony of expert witness as basis for new trial on ground of newly discovered evidence, 38 ALR3d 812.

Criminal liability for wrongfully obtaining unemployment benefits, 80 ALR3d 1280; 22 ALR4th 534.

Materiality of testimony forming basis of perjury as question for court or jury in state trial, 37 ALR4th 948.

Sec. 11.56.200.
Perjury.

A person commits the crime of perjury if the person makes a false sworn statement which the person does not believe to be true.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not a defense that

the statement was inadmissible under the rules of evidence; or

the oath or affirmation was taken or administered in an irregular manner.

Perjury is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “statement,” “sworn statement” — AS

11.56.240

Unsworn falsification — AS

11.56.220

Perjury by inconsistent statements — AS

11.56.230

Retraction as a defense — AS

11.56.235

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.010; AS 11.30.020.

TD: II 98-99.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For falsifications of affidavits required under AS

16.05.407

and

16.05.408

as perjury, see AS

16.05.407(b)

and

16.05.408

(b).

Sec. 11.56.205.
Unsworn falsification in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of unsworn falsification in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.56.210(a)(1)

and the application is an application for a permanent fund dividend.

In this section,

“application for a permanent fund dividend” includes a written or electronic application and any other documentation submitted to support an application for a permanent fund dividend;

“permanent fund dividend” has the meaning given in AS

43.23.295

.

Unsworn falsification in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 7 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.295

” was substituted for “43.23.095” in paragraph (b)(2) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For punishment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.210.
Unsworn falsification in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of unsworn falsification in the second degree if, with the intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of a duty, the person submits a false written or recorded statement that the person does not believe to be true

in an application for a benefit; or

on a form bearing notice, authorized by law, that false statements made in it are punishable.

Unsworn falsification in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Definition of “benefit,” “law,” “public servant” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “statement” — AS

11.56.240

(1)

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 99-101.

For the crime of false information or report, see AS

11.56.800

.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.220.
Proof of guilt.

In a prosecution for perjury or unsworn falsification in the first or second degree, it is not necessary that proof be made by a particular number of witnesses or by documentary or other type of evidence.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Unsworn falsification — AS

11.56.210

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 102-03.

Sec. 11.56.230.
Perjury by inconsistent statements.

A person commits the crime of perjury by inconsistent statements if

in the course of one or more official proceedings the person makes two or more sworn statements which are irreconcilably inconsistent to the degree that one of them is necessarily false;

the person does not believe one of the statements to be true at the time the statement is made; and

each statement is made within the jurisdiction of this state and within the period of the statute of limitations for the crime charged.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not necessary for the state to prove which statement was false but only that one or the other was false and not believed by the defendant to be true at the time the defendant made the statement. Proof of the irreconcilable inconsistency of the statements is prima facie evidence that one or the other of the statements was false.

Perjury by inconsistent statements is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “statement,” “sworn statement” — AS

11.56.240

Definition of “official proceeding” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II 104-106.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provisions relating to limitations on actions, see AS

09.10.030

–

09.10.240

.

Sec. 11.56.235.
Retraction as a defense.

In a prosecution under AS

11.56.200

or

11.56.230

, if the false statement was made in an official proceeding, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant expressly retracted the false statement

during the course of the same official proceeding;

before discovery of the falsification became known to the defendant;

before reliance upon the false statement by the person for whom it was intended; and

if the official proceeding involved a trier of fact, before the subject matter of the official proceeding was submitted to the ultimate trier of fact.

In a prosecution under AS

11.56.200

, if the false statement was not made in an official proceeding, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant expressly retracted the false statement

before discovery of the falsification became known to the defendant; and

before reliance upon the false statement by the person for whom it was intended.

In a prosecution under AS

11.56.210

, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant expressly retracted the false statement before reliance upon the false statement by the person for whom it was intended.

As used in this section, “during the course of the same official proceeding” includes separate hearings at separate stages of the same official proceeding.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “statement” — AS

11.56.240

(1)

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “official proceedings” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Unsworn falsification — AS

11.56.210

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.56.240.
Definitions.

In AS

11.56.200

—

11.56.240

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“statement” means a representation of fact and includes a representation of opinion, belief, or other state of mind when the representation clearly relates to state of mind apart from or in addition to any facts that are the subject of the representation;

“sworn statement” means

a statement knowingly given under oath or affirmation attesting to the truth of what is stated, including a notarized statement; or

a statement knowingly given under penalty of perjury under AS

09.63.020

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Certification of documents — AS

09.63.020

Original Code Provision — None.

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.56.900

.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.